zh-CN: 后备箱置物区配置: 载货三轮车; 载货自行车; 前后货架; 前载式; 长尾款; 中尾款; 后置储物箱; 边车; 多功能平台; 其他
pl: Konfiguracja przestrzeni ładunkowej: Trójkołowiec cargo; Rower towarowy (cycle truck); Bagażniki przednie i tylne; Przedni załadunek (Longjohn); Longtail (przedłużony tył); Midtail (średni tył); Skrzynia tylna; Wózek boczny; Platforma użytkowa; Inne
ro-RO: Configurația zonei de marfă: Tricicletă cargo; Bicicletă utilitară; Portbagaje față și spate; Încărcare frontală; Longtail; Midtail; Cutie spate; Ataș; Platformă utilitară; Altele
nl: Laadruim configuratie: Bakfiets (driewieler); Transportfiets; Voor- en achterrekken; Voorlader; Longtail; Midtail; Achterbox; Zijspan; Laadplatform; Overige
bg-BG: Конфигурация на товарното пространство: Товарна триколка; Товарно колело; Преден и заден багажник; С предно товарене; Удължена задна част (longtail); Средна задна част (midtail); Задна кутия; Кош за мотор; Работна платформа; Друго
lt-LT: Krovininės zonos konfigūracija: Krovininis triratis; Krovininis dviratis; Priekinės ir galinės bagažinės; Priekinio krovimo; Prailginta galinė dalis; Vidutinės bazės; Galinė dėžė; Šoninė priekaba; Universali platforma; Kita
pt-BR: Configuração da área de carga: Triciclo de carga; Bicicleta cargueira; Bagageiros dianteiro e traseiro; Carregamento frontal; Longtail; Midtail; Caixa traseira; Sidecar; Plataforma utilitária; Outro
cs: Konfigurace nákladového prostoru: Nákladní tříkolka; Nákladní kolo; Přední a zadní nosiče; Přední nakládání; Longtail; Midtail; Zadní box; Sajdkára; Užitková platforma; Jiné
fr: Configuration de l’espace de chargement: Tricycle cargo; Porteur; Porte-bagages avant et arrière; Chargeur avant; Longtail; Midtail; Caisse arrière; Side-car; Plateforme utilitaire; Autre
ko: 적재 공간 구성: 화물용 세발자전거; 사이클 트럭; 전면 및 후면 랙; 프런트 로더; 롱테일; 미드테일; 후면 박스; 사이드카; 다용도 플랫폼; 기타
en: Cargo area configuration: Cargo tricycle; Cycle truck; Front and rear racks; Front loader; Longtail; Midtail; Rear box; Sidecar; Utility platform; Other
tr: Yük alanı yapılandırması: Kargo üç tekerlekli bisikleti; Yük bisikleti; Ön ve arka taşıyıcılar; Önden yüklemeli; Uzun kuyruklu; Orta kuyruklu; Arka kutu; Yan sepet; Taşıma platformu; Diğer
de: Konfiguration des Laderaums: Lastendreirad; Bäckerrad; Vordere und hintere Gepäckträger; Frontlader; Longtail; Midtail; Heckbox; Beiwagen; Nutzplattform; Sonstige
nb: Konfigurasjon av bagasjerom: Laste-trehjulssykkel; Lastesykkel; Bagasjebrett foran og bak; Frontlaster; Longtail; Midtail; Bakboks; Sidevogn; Lasteplattform; Annet
hu: Raktér-konfiguráció: Teherszállító tricikli; Teherszállító kerékpár; Első és hátsó csomagtartók; Elöltöltős; Longtail; Midtail; Hátsó doboz; Oldalkocsi; Teherszállító platform; Egyéb
sk-SK: Konfigurácia batožinového priestoru: Nákladná trojkolka; Nákladný bicykel; Predné a zadné nosiče; Nakladanie vpredu; Longtail; Midtail; Zadný box; Sajdkára; Úžitková plošina; Iné
hr-HR: Konfiguracija teretnog prostora: Teretni tricikl; Teretni bicikl; Prednji i stražnji nosači tereta; Prednji utovarivač; Longtail (produženi stražnji dio); Midtail (srednje dugi stražnji dio); Stražnja kutija; Prikolica sa strane; Višenamjenska platforma; Ostalo
vi: Cấu hình khu vực chở hàng: Xe đạp ba bánh chở hàng; Xe đạp tải; Giá chở hàng trước và sau; Xe đạp chở hàng phía trước; Xe đạp đuôi dài; Xe đạp đuôi ngắn; Hộp sau; Sidecar; Khung chở hàng đa năng; Khác
el: Διαμόρφωση χώρου αποσκευών: Τρίκυκλο μεταφοράς φορτίου; Ποδήλατο μεταφοράς; Μπροστινές και πίσω σχάρες; Με μπροστινό κάδο; Longtail; Midtail; Πίσω κουτί; Sidecar; Πλατφόρμα πολλαπλών χρήσεων; Άλλο
fi: Tavaratilan rakenne: Tavarapyörä (kolmipyöräinen); Rahtipyörä (kaksipyöräinen); Etu- ja takatelineet; Etulastaaja; Pitkäperä; Keskipitkäperä; Takalaatikko; Sivuvaunu; Hyötylavapyörä; Muu
sv: Lastutrymmeskonfiguration: Lasttrehjuling; Transportcykel; Främre och bakre pakethållare; Frontlastare; Longtail; Midtail; Baklåda; Sidovagn; Lastplattform; Annat
pt-PT: Configuração da área de carga: Triciclo de carga; Bicicleta de carga (Cycle truck); Porta-bagagens frontal e traseiro; Carregamento frontal; Longtail; Midtail; Caixa traseira; Sidecar; Plataforma utilitária; Outra
th: รูปแบบพื้นที่บรรทุกสินค้า: รถสามล้อบรรทุก; รถบรรทุกสองล้อ; ตะแกรงหน้าและหลัง; แร็คบรรทุกด้านหน้า; ลองเทล; มิดเทล; กล่องหลัง; ไซด์คาร์; แพลตฟอร์มอเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
es: Configuración del área de carga: Triciclo de carga; Bicicleta de carga; Portaequipajes delantero y trasero; De carga delantera; Longtail; Midtail; Caja trasera; Sidecar; Plataforma utilitaria; Otro
it: Configurazione dell'area di carico: Triciclo da carico; Bici da carico; Portapacchi anteriori e posteriori; A carico anteriore; Longtail; Midtail; Box posteriore; Sidecar; Piattaforma di servizio; Altro
da: Konfiguration af lastrum: Ladcykel (trehjulet); Budcykel; For- og bagagebærer; Frontlæsser; Longtail; Midtail; Bagageboks; Sidevogn; Ladeplatform; Andet
ru: Конфигурация грузовой зоны: Грузовой трицикл; Грузовой велосипед (Cycle truck); Передняя и задняя стойки; С передней загрузкой; Лонгтейл (Longtail); Мидтейл (Midtail); Задний короб; С коляской; Грузовая платформа; Другое
sl-SI: Konfiguracija tovornega prostora: Tovorni tricikel; Tovorno kolo (cycle truck); Sprednji in zadnji prtljažnik; Sprednji nakladalnik; Dolgi zadek (longtail); Srednji zadek (midtail); Zadnji zaboj; Stranska prikolica; Pomožna platforma; Drugo
ja: 荷台構造: カーゴトライク; サイクルトラック; フロント/リアラック; フロントローダー; ロングテール; ミッドテール; リアボックス; サイドカー; ユーティリティプラットフォーム; その他
zh-TW: 載貨區域配置: 載貨三輪車; 貨運單車; 前後貨架; 前置式; 長尾式; 中尾式; 後置箱; 邊車; 實用平台; 其他